District of Columbia statutes.
38-1202.07

Repealed

Personnel System.

Repealed.

Oct. 26, 1974, 88 Stat. 1428, Pub. L. 93-471, title II, § 207
Sept. 9, 1975, D.C. Law 1-12, § 3(c), 22 DCR 1807
Nov. 1, 1975, D.C. Law 1-36, § 4, 22 DCR 2927
Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 3204(f), 25 DCR 5740
1973 Ed., § 31-1717.